Montana, session 2025, SB364.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Kill switches in electronic consumer products ON PERSONALLY OWNED PROPERTY --
warrant required -- exceptions -- definitions. (1) An entity may not activate a kill switch on an individual's
electronic consumer product personally owned property without a court order or a warrant issued pursuant to
Title 46, chapter 5, part 2.
(2) This section does not apply to:
(a) subscriptions, memberships, and other recurring-payment programs, or to leased electronic
consumer products electronic devices used to enforce retail installment sale agreements, lease agreements,
rental agreements, and other secured creditor agreements, or to motor vehicles subject to collections. In the
event an individual neglects to make regular payments, the entity may activate a kill switch to turn off the
individual's subscribed services. An entity shall disclose the existence of the kill switch and the capability of
activating it prior to entering into an agreement or contract.
(b) a mechanism or feature that:
(i) addresses an imminent critical safety issue impacting a mechanical or software component of a
motor vehicle;
(ii) activates when a driver of a motor vehicle is incapacitated, suffers a medical emergency, or
experiences a loss of consciousness;
(iii) takes corrective action in a motor vehicle with an engaged partial driving automation feature if
the driver is not attentive or engaged in the driving task and does not respond to warnings;
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 364
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB 364
(iv) brings a motor vehicle with an engaged automated driving system to a minimal risk condition;
or
(v) automatically shuts off the engine or motor of an idling motor vehicle that has been left on for
an extended period of time while in the park position.
(3) As used in [sections 1 and 2 through 3], the following definitions apply:
(a) "Electronic consumer product" includes electronic devices as defined in 45-6-310 as well as
motor vehicles as defined in 61-1-101.
(b)(a) "Entity" means a company that manufactures or distributes an electronic consumer product
personally owned property or that provides service for an electronic consumer product's its functionality.
(c)(b) “Hard reset” means the restoration of an electronic consumer product personally owned
property to the state the electronic consumer product it was in when it left the factory. Other terms commonly
used are "factory reset" and "master reset".
(d)(c) "Individual" means a natural person.
(e)(d) "Kill switch" means a mechanism that may be engaged remotely, regardless of the owner's
consent, and is used to:
(i) shut down or perform a hard reset on an electronic consumer product personally owned
property;
(ii) hasten the battery drainage of an electronic consumer product personally owned property; or
(iii) shorten the software lifespan of an electronic consumer product personally owned property.
Section 2. Enforcement -- damages. (1) A violation of [section 1] is a violation of 30-14-103.
(2) The department of justice may bring an action to restrain any unlawful act pursuant to the
provisions of Title 30, chapter 14, part 1.
(3) An individual whose electronic consumer product personally owned property has a kill switch
activated in violation of [section 1] may bring an action pursuant to 30-14-133, except that:
(a) the individual needs to show only a violation of [section 1] for that individual’s electronic
consumer product personally owned property and is not required to show any other ascertainable loss of
money or property; and
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 364
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB 364
(b) the individual is entitled to statutory damages of $10,000 for each violation of [section 1] in
addition to any other damages or monetary award pursuant to 30-14-133.
Section 3. User consent. A kill switch may be activated on stolen personally owned property with
consent of the property owner.
Section 4. Codification instruction. [Sections 1 through 3] are intended to be codified as a new
part in Title 30, chapter 14, and the provisions of Title 30, chapter 14, apply to [sections 1 through 3].
Section 5. Effective date. [This act] is effective October 1, 2025.
- END -
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – SB 364
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
SB 364, originated in the Senate.
___________________________________________
Secretary of the Senate
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

SENATE BILL NO. 364
INTRODUCED BY K. BOGNER
AN ACT ESTABLISHING KILL SWITCH LAWS; PROHIBITING AN ENTITY FROM REMOTELY ACTIVATING A
KILL SWITCH WITHOUT A WARRANT; PROVIDING AN EXCEPTION EXCEPTIONS; PROVIDING DAMAGES;
AND PROVIDING AN EFFECTIVE DATE.”